Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
38-151

Credentialing system; administrative costs; how paid; patient
safety fee.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the revenue to cover the cost of
the credentialing system administered by the department is to be derived from
General Funds, cash funds, federal funds, gifts, grants, or fees from
individuals or businesses seeking credentials except as otherwise provided in
section 38-155. The credentialing system includes the totality of the
credentialing infrastructure and the process of issuance and renewal of
credentials, examinations, inspections, investigations, continuing competency,
compliance assurance, the periodic review under section 38-128, and the
activities conducted under the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act,
for individuals and businesses that provide health services, health-related
services, and environmental services.

(2) The department shall determine the cost of the credentialing system for
such individuals and businesses by calculating the total of the base costs, the
variable costs, and any adjustments as provided in sections 38-152 to
38-154.

(3) When fees are to be established pursuant to section 38-155 for individuals
or businesses, the department, with the recommendation of the appropriate board
if applicable, shall base the fees on the cost of the credentialing system and
shall include usual and customary cost increases, a reasonable reserve, and the
cost of any new or additional credentialing activities. All such fees shall be
used as provided in section 38-157.

(4) In addition to the fees established under section 38-155, each applicant
for the initial issuance and renewal of a credential to practice as a physician
or an osteopathic physician under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act shall
pay a patient safety fee of fifty dollars and to practice as a physician
assistant under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act shall pay a patient safety
fee of twenty dollars, which fee shall be collected biennially with the initial
or renewal fee for the credential. Revenue from such fee shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Patient Safety Cash Fund. The patient
safety fee shall terminate on January 1, 2026, unless extended by the
Legislature.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 61, p. 469;

C.S.1929, § 71-701;

Laws 1935, c. 142, § 34, p. 531;

Laws 1937, c. 157, § 1, p. 615;

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 1, p. 555;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-701;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 16, p. 545;

R.S.1943, § 71-162;

Laws 1953, c. 238, § 3, p. 825;

Laws 1955, c. 270, § 2, p. 850;

Laws 1957, c. 292, § 1, p. 1048;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 12, p. 1080;

Laws 1959, c. 318, § 2, p. 1166;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 8, p. 1054;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 1, p. 1314;

Laws 1965, c. 412, § 1, p. 1319;

Laws 1967, c. 438, § 4, p. 1350;

Laws 1967, c. 439, § 17, p. 1364;

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 6, p. 2281;

Laws 1969, c. 562, § 1, p. 2288;

Laws 1971, LB 300, § 1;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 9;

Laws 1973, LB 515, § 3;

Laws 1975, LB 92, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 689, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 12;

Laws 1979, LB 4, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 428, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 8;

Laws 1982, LB 263, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 448, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 449, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 450, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 22;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 72;

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 14;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 64;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 36;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 26;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 12;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 80;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 54;

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 23;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 113;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 81;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-162;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB283, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 51;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB25, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB112, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 44.

Fees of state boards, see sections 33-151 and 33-152.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section
38-2001.

Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, see section
71-6201.